Hawaii statutes.
[§414D-324] Severability. If any
provision of this chapter or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid by a court of competent jurisdiction, the invalidity does not
affect other provisions or applications of this chapter that can be given
effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the
provisions of this chapter are severable. [L 2001, c 105, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next